Washington statutes.
RCW 43.62.010

Office of financial management—Population studies—Expenditures.

If the state or any of its political subdivisions, or other agencies, use the population studies services of the office of financial management or the successor thereto, the state, its political subdivision, or other agencies utilizing such services shall pay for the cost of rendering such services. Expenditures shall be paid out of funds allocated to cities and towns under *RCW 82.44.155 and shall be paid from said fund before any allocations or payments are made to cities and towns under *RCW 82.44.155.

[ 1990 c 42 s 317; 1979 c 151 s 127; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 121; 1965 c 8 s 43.62.010. Prior: 1957 c 175 s 1; 1951 c 96 s 1; 1947 c 51 s 2; RRS s 5508-11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 82.44.155 was repealed by 2006 c 318 s 10.

Purpose—Effective dates—Application—Implementation—1990 c 42: See notes following RCW 46.68.090.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.